Utah statutes.
16-10a-1510.   Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation.
(1)  The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state may resign the agency appointment by delivering to the
division for filing a statement of resignation, which shall be signed by the
resigning registered agent and accompanied by two exact or conformed copies of
the statement of resignation.  The statement of resignation may include a
statement that the registered office is also discontinued.  The statement of
resignation filed by the registered agent shall include a declaration that
notice of the resignation has been given to the corporation.
(2)  After filing the statement of resignation, the division shall deliver one
copy of the resignation to the registered office of the foreign corporation
and the other copy to its principal office.
(3)  The agency appointment terminates, and the registered office discontinues
if so provided, on the 31st day after the filing date of the statement of
resignation.
